apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.fr.metadix
    <pardef n="réso/udre__vblex">
<e><p><l>lu</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lue</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lues</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lurent</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lus</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lus</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lus</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lusse</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lussent</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lusses</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lussiez</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lussions</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lut</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lvaient</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lvais</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lvais</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lvait</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lvant</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lvant</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lve</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lve</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lvent</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lvent</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lves</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lvez</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lvez</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
<e><p><l>lvez</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lviez</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lviez</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lvions</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lvions</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lvons</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lvons</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
<e><p><l>lvons</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lûmes</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lût</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>lûtes</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>udra</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>udrai</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>udraient</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>udrais</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>udrais</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>udrait</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>udras</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>udre</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>udrez</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>udriez</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>udrions</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>udrons</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>udront</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>us</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>us</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
<e><p><l>us</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>us</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ut</l><r>udre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    	 <e lm="résoudre"><i>réso</i><par n="réso/udre__vblex"/></e>
